District of Columbia statutes.
47-1365

Tenant or person with less than fee simple interest paying taxes or levies to have credit out of rents.

A tenant or person with less than a fee simple interest from whom payment is obtained (“payor”), by distress or otherwise, of taxes due from an owner or other person under whom the payor holds shall receive a credit for the payment against the rents that the payor owes, except when:

(1)

The payor is bound either by operation of law or by contract to pay the taxes;

(2)

The real property is the subject of receivership proceedings; or

(3)

The Mayor has taken possession of the real property in accordance with § 47-1363.

June 9, 2001, D.C. Law 13-305, § 507(a)(2), 48 DCR 334
For temporary (225 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Temporary Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Law 14-8, June 13, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 5916).
For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 7 of Real Property Tax Clarity and Litter Control Administration Emergency Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-22, March 16, 2001, 48 DCR 2706).